South Dakota, session 2026, HB1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-20A-111 be AMENDED:
34-20A-111. A person who experiences a drug-related overdose and is in need of
medical assistance may not be arrested, charged, or prosecuted for any misdemeanor or
felony offense of possession, inhalation, ingestion, or otherwise taking into the body any
controlled drug or substance if that person or another person contacts law enforcement
or emergency medical services and requests medical assistance because of a drug-related
overdose. A person qualifies for the immunities provided in this section only if the evidence
for the charge or prosecution was obtained as a result of the drug-related overdose and
the need for medical assistance.

26.587.12 2 1183
An Act to revise qualifications for immunity from prosecution following a drug-related
overdose.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1183
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1183 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1183 ENROLLED